Idaho, session 2026, S1286.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 48, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 48-603H, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
48-603H. VETERANS BENEFITS CONSUMER PROTECTIONS. (1) As used in this
section:
(a) "Compensation" means a payment of any money, thing of value, or fi-
nancial benefit.
(b) "Veterans benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or
prosecution of, or advertising or consulting for, any claim affecting
any person who has filed or expressed an intent to file a claim for any
benefit, program, service, commodity, function, or status to which en-
titlement is determined under the laws and regulations administered by
the United States department of veterans affairs, the United States de-
partment of war, or the Idaho division of veterans services pertaining
to veterans, veterans' dependents or survivors, or any other individ-
ual eligible for such benefit, program, service, commodity, function,
or status.
(2)(a) Except as permitted under federal law, no individual shall re-
ceive compensation for a veterans benefits matter before the United
States department of veterans affairs, the United States department of
war, or the Idaho division of veterans services.
(b) No person shall receive compensation for referring any individ-
ual to another person for a veterans benefits matter before the United
States department of veterans affairs, the United States department of
war, or the Idaho division of veterans services.
(3) Persons not accredited by the United States department of veterans
affairs and not acting as agents or attorneys but seeking to receive compen-
sation for any veterans benefits matter shall enter into a written fee agree-
ment signed by both parties. Such agreement shall provide that compensation
is contingent on an increase in benefits awarded, and if successful, compen-
sation shall not exceed five (5) times the amount of the monthly increase in
benefits awarded based on the claim. No initial or nonrefundable fee may be
charged by a person handling a veterans benefits matter.
(4) Any person receiving compensation for a veterans benefit matter
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall provide the following writ-


ten disclosure clearly and conspicuously before the consumer signs the fee
agreement:
This business is not sponsored by or affiliated with the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Idaho Division of
Veterans Services, or any federally chartered veterans service
organization. Other organizations, including but not limited to
the Idaho Division of Veterans Services, local veterans service
organizations, and federally chartered veterans service organiza-
tions, may be able to provide you with this service free of charge.
Products or services offered by this business are not necessarily
endorsed by any of these organizations. You may qualify for other
veterans benefits beyond the benefits for which you are receiving
services here.
(5) Any person receiving compensation for a veterans benefits matter
under a fee agreement pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) May not utilize international call centers or data centers for pro-
cessing veterans' personal information;
(b) May not use a veteran's personal log-in, username, or password in-
formation to access a veteran's medical, financial, or government bene-
fits information;
(c) Shall ensure that any individual who has access to a veteran's medi-
cal or financial information undergoes a background check prior to hav-
ing access to such information. The background check must be conducted
by a reputable source and include identity verification and a criminal
records check; and
(d) May not receive any compensation for any services rendered in con-
nection with any claim filed within the one (1) year presumptive period
of active-duty release, unless the veteran acknowledges in writing that
the veteran is within this period and choosing to deny available free
services.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed as applying to, limit-
ing, or expanding the requirements imposed on agents, attorneys, or other
representatives accredited and regulated by the United States department of
veterans affairs.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.